src/ateq-kal-morph.txt
LEXICON Z1ateqPZ-suf  !SUB
+N+Prop+Abs+Pl:%>%TRUNCt	K ; !Z1ateqZ
+N+Prop+Abs+Pl+1Sg:%>%TRUNCutikka	K ; !Z1ateqZ
+N+Prop+Abs+Pl+2Sg:%>%TRUNCutitit	K ; !Z1ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Abs+Pl+3Sg:%>%TRUNCutai	K ; !Z1ateqZ
+N+Prop+Abs+Pl+4Sg:%>%TRUNCutini	K ; !Z1ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Abs+Pl+1Pl:%>%TRUNCutivut	K ; !Z1ateqZ
+TAQ+N+Prop+Abs+Pl+1Pl:%>%TRUNCrtavut	K ; !Z1ateqZ
+N+Prop+Abs+Pl+2Pl:%>%TRUNCutisi	K ; !Z1ateqZ 
+TAQ+N+Prop+Abs+Pl+2Pl:%>%TRUNCrtasi	K ; !Z1ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Abs+Pl+3Pl:%>%TRUNCutaat	K ; !Z1ateqZ
+TAQ+N+Prop+Abs+Pl+3Pl:%>%TRUNCrtaat	K ; !Z1ateqZ
+N+Prop+Abs+Pl+4Pl:%>%TRUNCutitik	K ; !Z1ateqZ
+TAQ+N+Prop+Abs+Pl+4Pl:%>%TRUNCrtatik	K ; !Z1ateqZ
+N+Prop+Rel+Pl:%>%TRUNCt	K ; !Z1ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Rel+Pl+1Sg:%>%TRUNCutima	K ; !Z1ateqZ
+N+Prop+Rel+Pl+2Sg:%>%TRUNCutivit	K ; !Z1ateqZ
+N+Prop+Rel+Pl+3Sg:%>%TRUNCutaata	K ; !Z1ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Rel+Pl+4Sg:%>%TRUNCutimi	K ; !Z1ateqZ
+N+Prop+Rel+Pl+1Pl:%>%TRUNCutitta	K ; !Z1ateqZ 
+TAQ+N+Prop+Rel+Pl+1Pl:%>%TRUNCrtatta	K ; !Z1ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Rel+Pl+2Pl:%>%TRUNCutissi	K ; !Z1ateqZ 
+TAQ+N+Prop+Rel+Pl+2Pl:%>%TRUNCrtassi	K ; !Z1ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Rel+Pl+3Pl:%>%TRUNCutaasa	K ; !Z1ateqZ 
+TAQ+N+Prop+Rel+Pl+3Pl:%>%TRUNCrtaasa	K ; !Z1ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Rel+Pl+4Pl:%>%TRUNCutimik	K ; !Z1ateqZ 
+TAQ+N+Prop+Rel+Pl+4Pl:%>%TRUNCrtamik	K ; !Z1ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Trm+Pl:%>%TRUNCnut	TrmVb ; !Z1ateqZ
+N+Prop+Trm+Pl+1Sg:%>%TRUNCutinnut	TrmVb ; !Z1ateqZ
+N+Prop+Trm+Pl+2Sg:%>%TRUNCutinnut	TrmVb ; !Z1ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Trm+Pl+3Sg:%>%TRUNCutaanut	TrmVb ; !Z1ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Trm+Pl+4Sg:%>%TRUNCutiminut	TrmVb ; !Z1ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Trm+Pl+1Pl:%>%TRUNCutitsinnut	TrmVb ; !Z1ateqZ
+TAQ+N+Prop+Trm+Pl+1Pl:%>%TRUNCrtatsinnut	TrmVb ; !Z1ateqZ
+N+Prop+Trm+Pl+2Pl:%>%TRUNCutissinnut	TrmVb ; !Z1ateqZ 
+TAQ+N+Prop+Trm+Pl+2Pl:%>%TRUNCrtassinnut	TrmVb ; !Z1ateqZ
+N+Prop+Trm+Pl+3Pl:%>%TRUNCutaannut	TrmVb ; !Z1ateqZ
+TAQ+N+Prop+Trm+Pl+3Pl:%>%TRUNCrtaannut	TrmVb ; !Z1ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Trm+Pl+4Pl:%>%TRUNCutiminnut	TrmVb ; !Z1ateqZ 
+TAQ+N+Prop+Trm+Pl+4Pl:%>%TRUNCrtaminnut	TrmVb ; !Z1ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Abl+Pl:%>%TRUNCnit	K ; !Z1ateqZ
+N+Prop+Abl+Pl+1Sg:%>%TRUNCutinnit	K ; !Z1ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Abl+Pl+2Sg:%>%TRUNCutinnit	K ; !Z1ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Abl+Pl+3Sg:%>%TRUNCutaanit	K ; !Z1ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Abl+Pl+4Sg:%>%TRUNCutiminit	K ; !Z1ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Abl+Pl+1Pl:%>%TRUNCutitsinnit	K ; !Z1ateqZ
+TAQ+N+Prop+Abl+Pl+1Pl:%>%TRUNCrtatsinnit	K ; !Z1ateqZ
+N+Prop+Abl+Pl+2Pl:%>%TRUNCutissinnit	K ; !Z1ateqZ
+TAQ+N+Prop+Abl+Pl+2Pl:%>%TRUNCrtassinnit	K ; !Z1ateqZ
+N+Prop+Abl+Pl+3Pl:%>%TRUNCutaannit	K ; !Z1ateqZ
+TAQ+N+Prop+Abl+Pl+3Pl:%>%TRUNCrtaannit	K ; !Z1ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Abl+Pl+4Pl:%>%TRUNCutiminnit	K ; !Z1ateqZ 
+TAQ+N+Prop+Abl+Pl+4Pl:%>%TRUNCrtaminnit	K ; !Z1ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Abl+Pl:%>%TRUNCniit	K ; !Z1ateqZ
+N+Prop+Abl+Pl+1Sg:%>%TRUNCutinniit	K ; !Z1ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Abl+Pl+2Sg:%>%TRUNCutinniit	K ; !Z1ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Abl+Pl+3Sg:%>%TRUNCutaaniit	K ; !Z1ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Abl+Pl+4Sg:%>%TRUNCutiminiit	K ; !Z1ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Abl+Pl+1Pl:%>%TRUNCutitsinniit	K ; !Z1ateqZ
+TAQ+N+Prop+Abl+Pl+1Pl:%>%TRUNCrtatsinniit	K ; !Z1ateqZ
+N+Prop+Abl+Pl+2Pl:%>%TRUNCutissinniit	K ; !Z1ateqZ
+TAQ+N+Prop+Abl+Pl+2Pl:%>%TRUNCrtassinniit	K ; !Z1ateqZ
+N+Prop+Abl+Pl+3Pl:%>%TRUNCutaanniit	K ; !Z1ateqZ
+TAQ+N+Prop+Abl+Pl+3Pl:%>%TRUNCrtaanniit	K ; !Z1ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Abl+Pl+4Pl:%>%TRUNCutiminniit	K ; !Z1ateqZ 
+TAQ+N+Prop+Abl+Pl+4Pl:%>%TRUNCrtaminniit	K ; !Z1ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Lok+Pl:%>%TRUNCni	LokVb ; !Z1ateqZ
+N+Prop+Lok+Pl+1Sg:%>%TRUNCutinni	LokVb ; !Z1ateqZ
+N+Prop+Lok+Pl+2Sg:%>%TRUNCutinni	LokVb ; !Z1ateqZ
+N+Prop+Lok+Pl+3Sg:%>%TRUNCutaani	LokVb ; 
+N+Prop+Lok+Pl+4Sg:%>%TRUNCutimini	LokVb ; 
+N+Prop+Lok+Pl+1Pl:%>%TRUNCutitsinni	LokVb ; 
+TAQ+N+Prop+Lok+Pl+1Pl:%>%TRUNCrtatsinni	LokVb ; 
+N+Prop+Lok+Pl+2Pl:%>%TRUNCutissinni	LokVb ; 
+TAQ+N+Prop+Lok+Pl+2Pl:%>%TRUNCrtassinni	LokVb ;
+N+Prop+Lok+Pl+3Pl:%>%TRUNCutaanni	LokVb ;
+TAQ+N+Prop+Lok+Pl+3Pl:%>%TRUNCrtaanni	LokVb ; 
+N+Prop+Lok+Pl+4Pl:%>%TRUNCutiminni	LokVb ; 
+TAQ+N+Prop+Lok+Pl+4Pl:%>%TRUNCrtaminni	LokVb ; !Z1ateqZ
+N+Prop+Aeq+Pl:%>%TRUNCtut	K ; !Z1ateqZ
+N+Prop+Aeq+Pl+1Sg:%>%TRUNCutittut	K ; !Z1ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Aeq+Pl+2Sg:%>%TRUNCutittut	K ; !Z1ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Aeq+Pl+3Sg:%>%TRUNCutaatut	K ; !Z1ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Aeq+Pl+4Sg:%>%TRUNCutimisut	K ; !Z1ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Aeq+Pl+1Pl:%>%TRUNCutitsitut	K ; !Z1ateqZ 
+TAQ+N+Prop+Aeq+Pl+1Pl:%>%TRUNCrtatsitut	K ; !Z1ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Aeq+Pl+2Pl:%>%TRUNCutissitut	K ; !Z1ateqZ 
+TAQ+N+Prop+Aeq+Pl+2Pl:%>%TRUNCrtassitut	K ; !Z1ateqZ
+N+Prop+Aeq+Pl+3Pl:%>%TRUNCutaattut	K ; !Z1ateqZ
+TAQ+N+Prop+Aeq+Pl+3Pl:%>%TRUNCrtaattut	K ; !Z1ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Aeq+Pl+4Pl:%>%TRUNCutimittut	K ; !Z1ateqZ 
+TAQ+N+Prop+Aeq+Pl+4Pl:%>%TRUNCrtamittut	K ; !Z1ateqZ
+N+Prop+Ins+Pl:%>%TRUNCnik	K ; !Z1ateqZ
+N+Prop+Ins+Pl+1Sg:%>%TRUNCutinnik	K ; !Z1ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Ins+Pl+2Sg:%>%TRUNCutinnik	K ; !Z1ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Ins+Pl+3Sg:%>%TRUNCutaanik	K ; !Z1ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Ins+Pl+4Sg:%>%TRUNCutiminik	K ; !Z1ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Ins+Pl+1Pl:%>%TRUNCutitsinnik	K ; !Z1ateqZ 
+TAQ+N+Prop+Ins+Pl+1Pl:%>%TRUNCrtatsinnik	K ; !Z1ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Ins+Pl+2Pl:%>%TRUNCutissinnik	K ; !Z1ateqZ 
+TAQ+N+Prop+Ins+Pl+2Pl:%>%TRUNCtassinnik	K ; !Z1ateqZ
+N+Prop+Ins+Pl+3Pl:%>%TRUNCutaannik	K ; !Z1ateqZ
+TAQ+N+Prop+Ins+Pl+3Pl:%>%TRUNCrtaannik	K ; !Z1ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Ins+Pl+4Pl:%>%TRUNCutiminnik	K ; !Z1ateqZ 
+TAQ+N+Prop+Ins+Pl+4Pl:%>%TRUNCrtaminnik	K ; !Z1ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Via+Pl:%>%TRUNCtigut	ViaVb ; !Z1ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Via+Pl+1Sg:%>%TRUNCutikkut	ViaVb ; !Z1ateqZ
+N+Prop+Via+Pl+2Sg:%>%TRUNCutikkut	ViaVb ; !Z1ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Via+Pl+3Sg:%>%TRUNCutaagut	ViaVb ; !Z1ateqZ
+N+Prop+Via+Pl+3Sg:%>%TRUNCutaatigut	ViaVb ; !Z1ateqZ
+N+Prop+Via+Pl+4Sg:%>%TRUNCutimigut	ViaVb ; !Z1ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Via+Pl+1Pl:%>%TRUNCutitsigut	ViaVb ; !Z1ateqZ 
+TAQ+N+Prop+Via+Pl+1Pl:%>%TRUNCrtatsigut	ViaVb ; !Z1ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Via+Pl+2Pl:%>%TRUNCutissigut	ViaVb ; !Z1ateqZ 
+TAQ+N+Prop+Via+Pl+2Pl:%>%TRUNCrtassigut	ViaVb ; !Z1ateqZ
+N+Prop+Via+Pl+3Pl:%>%TRUNCutaatigut	ViaVb ; !Z1ateqZ
+TAQ+N+Prop+Via+Pl+3Pl:%>%TRUNCrtaatigut	ViaVb ; !Z1ateqZ
+N+Prop+Via+Pl+4Pl:%>%TRUNCutimikkut	ViaVb ; !Z1ateqZ
+TAQ+N+Prop+Via+Pl+4Pl:%>%TRUNCtamikkut	ViaVb ; !Z1ateqZ


LEXICON Z2-ateqZ
! :- Z2-ateqZ-suf ;     !SUB
    Z2-ateqZ-suf ;     !SUB
LEXICON Z2-ateqZ-suf   !SUB
+N+Prop+Attr: # ; !Z2ateqZ
+N+Prop+Abs+Sg:	K ; !Z2-ateqZ
+N+Prop+Abs+Sg+1Sg:%>%TRUNCutiga	K ; !Z2-ateqZ
+N+Prop+Abs+Sg+2Sg:%>%TRUNCutit	K ; !Z2-ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Abs+Sg+3Sg:%>%TRUNCutaa	K ; !Z2-ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Abs+Sg+4Sg:%>%TRUNCutini	K ; !Z2-ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Abs+Sg+1Pl:%>%TRUNCuterput	K ; !Z2-ateqZ
+TAQ+N+Prop+Abs+Sg+1Pl:%>tarput	K ; !Z2-ateqZ
+N+Prop+Abs+Sg+2Pl:%>%TRUNCutersi	K ; !Z2-ateqZ
+TAQ+N+Prop+Abs+Sg+2Pl:%>tarsi	K ; !Z2-ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Abs+Sg+3Pl:%>%TRUNCutaat	K ;!Z2-ateqZ
+TAQ+N+Prop+Abs+Sg+3Pl:%>taat	K ; !Z2-ateqZ
+N+Prop+Abs+Sg+4Pl:%>%TRUNCutertik	K ;!Z2-ateqZ
+TAQ+N+Prop+Abs+Sg+4Pl:%>tartik	K ;!Z2-ateqZ
+N+Prop+Rel+Sg:%>%TRUNCup	K ; !Z2-ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Rel+Sg+1Sg:%>%TRUNCutima	K ; !Z2-ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Rel+Sg+2Sg:%>%TRUNCutivit	K ; !Z2-ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Rel+Sg+3Sg:%>%TRUNCutaata	K ; !Z2-ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Rel+Sg+4Sg:%>%TRUNCutimi	K ; !Z2-ateqZ
+N+Prop+Rel+Sg+1Pl:%>%TRUNCutitta	K ; !Z2-ateqZ 
+TAQ+N+Prop+Rel+Sg+1Pl:%>tatta	K ; !Z2-ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Rel+Sg+2Pl:%>%TRUNCutissi	K ; !Z2-ateqZ 
+TAQ+N+Prop+Rel+Sg+2Pl:%>tassi	K ; !Z2-ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Rel+Sg+3Pl:%>%TRUNCutaata	K ; !Z2-ateqZ 
+TAQ+N+Prop+Rel+Sg+3Pl:%>taata	K ; !Z2-ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Rel+Sg+4Pl:%>%TRUNCutimik	K ; !Z2-ateqZ 
+TAQ+N+Prop+Rel+Sg+4Pl:%>tamik	K ; !Z2-ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Trm+Sg:%>mut	TrmVb ; !Z2-ateqZ
+N+Prop+Trm+Sg+1Sg:%>%TRUNCutinnut	TrmVb ; !Z2-ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Trm+Sg+2Sg:%>%TRUNCutinnut	TrmVb ; !Z2-ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Trm+Sg+3Sg:%>%TRUNCutaanut	TrmVb ; !Z2-ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Trm+Sg+4Sg:%>%TRUNCutiminut	TrmVb ; !Z2-ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Trm+Sg+1Pl:%>%TRUNCutitsinnut	TrmVb ; !Z2-ateqZ 
+TAQ+N+Prop+Trm+Sg+1Pl:%>tatsinnut	TrmVb ; !Z2-ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Trm+Sg+2Pl:%>%TRUNCutissinnut	TrmVb ; !Z2-ateqZ 
+TAQ+N+Prop+Trm+Sg+2Pl:%>tassinnut	TrmVb ; !Z2-ateqZ
+N+Prop+Trm+Sg+3Pl:%>%TRUNCutaannut	TrmVb ; !Z2-ateqZ
+TAQ+N+Prop+Trm+Sg+3Pl:%>taannut	TrmVb ; !Z2-ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Trm+Sg+4Pl:%>%TRUNCutiminnut	TrmVb ; !Z2-ateqZ 
+TAQ+N+Prop+Trm+Sg+4Pl:%>taminnut	TrmVb ; !Z2-ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Abl+Sg:%>mit	K ; !Z2-ateqZ
+N+Prop+Abl+Sg+1Sg:%>%TRUNCutinnit	K ; !Z2-ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Abl+Sg+2Sg:%>%TRUNCutinnit	K ; !Z2-ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Abl+Sg+3Sg:%>%TRUNCutaanit	K ; !Z2-ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Abl+Sg+4Sg:%>%TRUNCutiminit	K ; !Z2-ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Abl+Sg+1Pl:%>%TRUNCutitsinnit	K ; !Z2-ateqZ
+TAQ+N+Prop+Abl+Sg+1Pl:%>tatsinnit	K ; !Z2-ateqZ
+N+Prop+Abl+Sg+2Pl:%>%TRUNCutissinnit	K ; !Z2-ateqZ
+TAQ+N+Prop+Abl+Sg+2Pl:%>tassinnit	K ;!Z2-ateqZ
+N+Prop+Abl+Sg+3Pl:%>%TRUNCutaannit	K ; !Z2-ateqZ
+TAQ+N+Prop+Abl+Sg+3Pl:%>taannit	K ; !Z2-ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Abl+Sg+4Pl:%>%TRUNCutiminnit	K ; !Z2-ateqZ 
+TAQ+N+Prop+Abl+Sg+4Pl:%>taminnit	K ; !Z2-ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Lok+Sg:%>mi	LokVb ; !Z2-ateqZ
+N+Prop+Lok+Sg+1Sg:%>%TRUNCutinni	LokVb ; 
+N+Prop+Lok+Sg+2Sg:%>%TRUNCutinni	LokVb ; 
+N+Prop+Lok+Sg+3Sg:%>%TRUNCutaani	LokVb ; 
+N+Prop+Lok+Sg+4Sg:%>%TRUNCutimini	LokVb ; 
+N+Prop+Lok+Sg+1Pl:%>%TRUNCutitsinni	LokVb ; 
+TAQ+N+Prop+Lok+Sg+1Pl:%>tatsinni	LokVb ; 
+N+Prop+Lok+Sg+2Pl:%>%TRUNCutissinni	LokVb ; 
+TAQ+N+Prop+Lok+Sg+2Pl:%>tassinni	LokVb ;
+N+Prop+Lok+Sg+3Pl:%>%TRUNCutaanni	LokVb ;!Z2-ateqZ
+TAQ+N+Prop+Lok+Sg+3Pl:%>taanni	LokVb ; !Z2-ateqZ
+N+Prop+Lok+Sg+4Pl:%>%TRUNCutiminni	LokVb ; !Z2-ateqZ
+TAQ+N+Prop+Lok+Sg+4Pl:%>taminni	LokVb ; !Z2-ateqZ
+N+Prop+Aeq+Sg:%>tut	K ; !Z2-ateqZ
+N+Prop+Aeq+Sg+1Sg:%>%TRUNCutittut	K ; !Z2-ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Aeq+Sg+2Sg:%>%TRUNCutittut	K ; !Z2-ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Aeq+Sg+3Sg:%>%TRUNCutaatut	K ; !Z2-ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Aeq+Sg+4Sg:%>%TRUNCutimisut	K ; !Z2-ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Aeq+Sg+1Pl:%>%TRUNCutitsitut	K ; !Z2-ateqZ 
+TAQ+N+Prop+Aeq+Sg+1Pl:%>tatsitut	K ; !Z2-ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Aeq+Sg+2Pl:%>%TRUNCutissitut	K ; !Z2-ateqZ 
+TAQ+N+Prop+Aeq+Sg+2Pl:%>tassitut	K ; !Z2-ateqZ
+N+Prop+Aeq+Sg+3Pl:%>%TRUNCutaattut	K ; !Z2-ateqZ
+TAQ+N+Prop+Aeq+Sg+3Pl:%>taattut	K ; !Z2-ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Aeq+Sg+4Pl:%>%TRUNCutimittut	K ; !Z2-ateqZ 
+TAQ+N+Prop+Aeq+Sg+4Pl:%>tamittut	K ; !Z2-ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Ins+Sg:%>mik	K ; !Z2-ateqZ
+N+Prop+Ins+Sg+1Sg:%>%TRUNCutinnik	K ; !Z2-ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Ins+Sg+2Sg:%>%TRUNCutinnik	K ; !Z2-ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Ins+Sg+3Sg:%>%TRUNCutaanik	K ; !Z2-ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Ins+Sg+4Sg:%>%TRUNCutiminik	K ; !Z2-ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Ins+Sg+1Pl:%>%TRUNCutitsinnik	K ; !Z2-ateqZ
+TAQ+N+Prop+Ins+Sg+1Pl:%>tatsinnik	K ; !Z2-ateqZ
+N+Prop+Ins+Sg+2Pl:%>%TRUNCutissinnik	K ; !Z2-ateqZ
+TAQ+N+Prop+Ins+Sg+2Pl:%>tassinnik	K ; !Z2-ateqZ
+N+Prop+Ins+Sg+3Pl:%>%TRUNCutaannik	K ; !Z2-ateqZ
+TAQ+N+Prop+Ins+Sg+3Pl:%>taannik	K ; !Z2-ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Ins+Sg+4Pl:%>%TRUNCutiminnik	K ; !Z2-ateqZ 
+TAQ+N+Prop+Ins+Sg+4Pl:%>taminnik	K ; !Z2-ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Via+Sg:%>%TRUNCkkut	ViaVb ; !Z2-ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Via+Sg+1Sg:%>%TRUNCutikkut	ViaVb ; !Z2-ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Via+Sg+2Sg:%>%TRUNCutikkut	ViaVb ; !Z2-ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Via+Sg+3Sg:%>%TRUNCutaagut	ViaVb ; !Z2-ateqZ
+N+Prop+Via+Sg+3Sg:%>%TRUNCutaatigut	ViaVb ; !Z2-ateqZ
+N+Prop+Via+Sg+4Sg:%>%TRUNCutimigut	ViaVb ; !Z2-ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Via+Sg+1Pl:%>%TRUNCutitsigut	ViaVb ; !Z2-ateqZ 
+TAQ+N+Prop+Via+Sg+1Pl:%>tatsigut	ViaVb ; !Z2-ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Via+Sg+2Pl:%>%TRUNCutissigut	ViaVb ; !Z2-ateqZ 
+TAQ+N+Prop+Via+Sg+2Pl:%>tassigut	ViaVb ; !Z2-ateqZ
+N+Prop+Via+Sg+3Pl:%>%TRUNCutaatigut	ViaVb ; !Z2-ateqZ
+TAQ+N+Prop+Via+Sg+3Pl:%>taatigut	ViaVb ; !Z2-ateqZ
+N+Prop+Via+Sg+4Pl:%>%TRUNCutimikkut	ViaVb ; !Z2-ateqZ
+TAQ+N+Prop+Via+Sg+4Pl:%>tamikkut	ViaVb ; !Z2-ateqZ
